Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.470

Uniformed personnel—Arbitration panel—Rights of parties.

During the pendency of the proceedings before the arbitration panel, existing wages, hours, and other conditions of employment shall not be changed by action of either party without the consent of the other but a party may so consent without prejudice to his or her rights or position under chapter 131, Laws of 1973.

[ 2012 c 117 s 88; 1973 c 131 s 6.]

NOTES:

Construction—1973 c 131: See RCW 41.56.905.